Maryland, session 2025, SB0694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–4001.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0694*

SENATE BILL 694
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Office” means the Office of the Correctional Ombudsman.
9–4006.
(a) On or before December 31 each year, the Office shall report to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of this article, the General Assembly on:
(1) investigations conducted by the Office;
(2) any actions taken by an agency as a result of the conclusions or
recommendations of the Office;
(3) any instance where an agency rejects a recommendation or conclusion
of the Office; [and]
(4) information on any death of an individual confined by or under the care
of an agency; AND
(5) THE STATUS OF COMPLETION, RESULTS, AND STATUS OF
IMPLEMENTATION OF RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE ASSESSMENT REQUIRED UNDER
§ 9–4009 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) In addition to the report required by subsection (a) of this section, the Office
shall provide to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of this article, the General
Assembly any other reports that the Governor or the General Assembly may require.
(c) A report prepared under this section shall be published on the Office’s website.
9–4009.
(A) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE OFFICE SHALL ENGAGE AN
INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT TO PERFORM A COMPREHENSIVE ASSESSMENT OF THE
STATE’S CORRECTIONAL SYSTEM.
(B) THE ASSESSMENT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) ADDRESS THE FOLLOWING ISSUES:
(I) INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING:
1. FACILITY LAYOUT;

SENATE BILL 694 3
2. CELL DESIGN;
3. RECREATION AND ACTIVITY AREAS; AND
4. TECHNOLOGY AND SECURITY SYSTEMS;
(II) STAFFING, INCLUDING:
1. STAFF–TO–INCARCERATED–INDIVIDUAL RATIOS;
2. TRAINING PROGRAMS; AND
3. STAFFING CHALLENGES;
(III) PROGRAMMING, INCLUDING:
1. THE EFFECTIVENESS OF CURRENT OFFERINGS;
2. PROGRAM ACCESSIBILITY; AND
3. PROGRAMMING GAPS;
(IV) MENTAL AND PHYSICAL HEALTH SERVICES, INCLUDING:
1. ACCESS TO CARE BY GENERAL AND SPECIAL
POPULATIONS; AND
2. HOW MARYLAND’S CARE PRACTICES COMPARE TO
NATIONAL STANDARDS; AND
(V) RESTRICTIVE HOUSING, INCLUDING:
1. CONDITIONS;
2. CURRENT POLICIES REGARDING DURATION LIMITS,
OUT–OF–CELL TIME, AND CRITERIA FOR PLACEMENT;
3. COMPLIANCE WITH BEST PRACTICES; AND
4. ALTERNATIVES TO RESTRICTIVE HOUSING;

SENATE BILL 694
(2) REFLECT THE INPUT OF STAKEHOLDERS AND INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS BY MEANS OF:
(I) INTERVIEWS;
(II) SURVEYS; AND
(III) PUBLIC HEARINGS; AND
(3) INCLUDE:
(I) A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS THAT ADDRESSES:
1. THE FINANCIAL IMPACT OF IMPLEMENTING
REFORMS; AND
2. POTENTIAL COST SAVINGS FROM REDUCED
RECIDIVISM AND IMPROVED INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OUTCOMES;
(II) A COMPARATIVE ANALYSIS THAT:
1. BENCHMARKS MARYLAND’S PRACTICES WITH THOSE
OF NEW YORK, NEW JERSEY, AND OTHER LEADING STATES TO IDENTIFY GAPS AND
AREAS FOR IMPROVEMENT; AND
2. IDENTIFIES BEST PRACTICES THAT HAVE PROVEN
EFFECTIVE ELSEWHERE; AND
(III) RECOMMENDATIONS AND AN IMPLEMENTATION PLAN,
INCLUDING:
1. ACTIONABLE STEPS FOR THE SHORT–, MID–, AND
LONG–TERM;
2. A REALISTIC TIMELINE FOR IMPLEMENTATION,
CONSIDERING FUNDING AND OPERATIONAL CONSTRAINTS; AND
3. MONITORING AND ONGOING EVALUATION.
(C) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2028, THE INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT
ENGAGED BY THE OFFICE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
COMPLETE THE ASSESSMENT AND PROVIDE THE OFFICE WITH A WRITTEN REPORT
OF ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS.

SENATE BILL 694 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.